Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,115
Review of disciplinary action; administrative review boards; membership.

Any review of disciplinary action imposed upon any person shall be pursuant to sections 83-4,109 to 83-4,123. The director shall establish procedures to review the disciplinary actions of inmates. The director may establish one or more administrative review boards within the department to review disciplinary actions. No member of any review board shall also be a member of a disciplinary hearing board, but the same considerations for appointing members to the disciplinary hearing board may apply to appointing members to a review board.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 57.